Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,153
State-certified seeds; growers; violations; dishonest practices; certification may be withheld.

The University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources or its designated agency or agencies may withhold certification, for a period not to exceed two years, from any grower of seeds or plant parts who is engaged in or attempting to engage in any dishonest practices for the purpose of evading the provisions of sections 81-2,149 to 81-2,154, including standards, rules, and regulations laid down by the institute to cover certification.

Laws 1931, c. 151, § 5, p. 410;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-1820;

R.S.1943, § 81-2,153;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 57.